District of Columbia statutes.
47-2817

Laundries; dry cleaning and dyeing establishments.

(a)

Owners or managers of laundries operated other than by hand power shall pay a license fee of $188 biennially.

(b)

Repealed.

(c)

(1)

Owners or managers of dry cleaning or dyeing establishments shall pay a license fee of $222 biennially.

(2)

Any license issued pursuant to this subsection shall be issued as an Environmental Materials endorsement to a basic business license under the basic business license system as set forth in subchapter I-A of this chapter.

(d)

Any license issued pursuant to this section, shall be in addition to those required under subsection (c)(2) of this section, if any, and shall be issued as a General Services and Repair endorsement to a basic business license under the basic business license system as set forth in subchapter I-A of this chapter.

July 1, 1902, 32 Stat. 625, ch. 1352, § 7, par. 17
July 1, 1932, 47 Stat. 553, ch. 366
Sept. 14, 1976, D.C. Law 1-82, title I, § 104(i), 23 DCR 2461
Sept. 26, 1995, D.C. Law 11-52, § 302(b), 42 DCR 3684
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-261, § 2003(pp)(14), 46 DCR 3142
Apr. 12, 2000, D.C. Law 13-91, § 157(d)(2), 47 DCR 520
Oct. 28, 2003, D.C. Law 15-38, § 3(hh)(4)(F), 50 DCR 6913
Mayor, Council and other offices, application of certain sections to boards, commissions and committees, see § 1-321.02.
1981 Ed., § 47-2817.
1973 Ed., § 47-2317.
D.C. Law 15-38, in subsec. (c)(2), substituted “an Environmental Materials endorsement to a basic business license under the basic” for “a Class A Environmental Materials endorsement to a master business license under the master”; and in subsec. (d), substituted “General Services and Repair endorsement to a basic business license under the basic” for “Class B General Services and Repair endorsement to a master business license under the master”.
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 3(hh)(4)(F) of Streamlining Regulation Emergency Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-145, August 11, 2003, 50 DCR 6896).